New Jersey, session 222, S4138.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Judicial warrant means a warrant based on probable cause and issued by a federal Article III judge or magistrate, or the State equivalent, that authorizes federal immigration authorities to search a location or apprehend a person who is the subject of the warrant. Law enforcement officer means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest, and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. b.    A law enforcement officer shall not participate in a civil immigration enforcement operation unless the operation is premised upon a valid judicial warrant. c.     The Attorney General shall issue guidelines or directives as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.